Washington statutes.
RCW 16.60.060

Partition fence—Discontinuance.

When any party shall wish to lay open his or her inclosure [enclosure], he or she shall notify any person owning adjoining inclosures [enclosures], and if such person shall not pay to the party giving notice one-half the value of any partition fence between such enclosures, within three months after receiving such notice, the party giving notice may proceed to remove one-half of such fence, as provided in RCW 16.60.055.

[ 2011 c 336 s 428; Code 1881 s 2496; 1873 p 449 s 9; 1871 p 65 s 9; 1869 p 325 s 9; RRS s 5449.]